Montana, session 2025, HB172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 5-5-233, MCA, is amended to read:
"5-5-233. Transportation interim committee. (1) The transportation interim committee has
administrative rule review, draft legislation review, program evaluation, and monitoring functions for the
department of transportation, the motor vehicle division of the department of justice, and the entities attached to
the department of transportation for administrative purposes.
(2) (a) The committee shall prepare for preintroduction into each regular session of the legislature
a joint resolution of the legislature recommending to the transportation commission construction and
reconstruction projects for prioritization pursuant to 60-2-110.
(b) The committee may prepare for preintroduction additional legislation to facilitate the prioritizing
of projects previously recommended by the legislature but not subsequently prioritized by the transportation
commission."
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 172

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 172.1

Section 2. Section 60-2-110, MCA, is amended to read:
"60-2-110. Setting priorities and selecting projects -- reporting. (1) Except as provided in 60-2-
133, the commission shall establish priorities and select and designate segments for construction and
reconstruction on the national highway system, the primary highway system, the secondary highway system,
the urban highway system, and state highways.
(2) The commission shall consult with the board of county commissioners of the county in which a
highway is located when establishing priorities and when selecting and designating segments on the secondary
highway system for construction and reconstruction.
(3) The commission shall consult with the appropriate local government authorities when
establishing priorities and selecting and designating segments on the urban highway system for construction
and reconstruction.
(4) (a) The commission shall report biennially to the transportation interim committee in
accordance with 5-11-210 on the status of construction and reconstruction projects recommended for
prioritization by joint resolution of the legislature. The report must be delivered in May of even-numbered years,
unless a different time is agreed to by the committee and the commission.
(b) If a project recommended by the legislature has not been prioritized, the commission shall
include in its report the technical, financial, and other factors that influenced its decision.
(4)(5) The commission shall use information gathered or discovered by and documents prepared by
the department, and department officials and employees shall provide assistance and advice, including the
preparation of documents necessary to help the commission to consider projects recommended by the
legislature.
(5)(6) The commission shall establish and determine priorities and projects for rail and transit
programs and, to the extent possible, coordinate intermodal transportation within the state.
(6)(7) In carrying out the requirements of this section, the department shall:
(a) make recommendations to the commission;
(b) establish the requirements and procedures for administering this section; and
(c) take all reasonable steps to ensure the integrity and viability of agricultural and rural
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 172

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 172.1
transportation and related needs."
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 172